Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.150

Unfunded liabilities—Employer contribution rates.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5357-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2015, and ending June 30, 2023, a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

(2) Beginning September 1, 2015, and ending August 31, 2023[,] a minimum 3.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

(3) Beginning September 1, 2015, and ending August 31, 2023, a minimum 5.75 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

(4)(a) Beginning July 1, 2023, and ending June 30, 2027, the following employer contribution rates shall be in effect for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

Fiscal Year ending:

2024

2025

2026

2027

2.50%

2.00%

1.50%

0.50%

(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a minimum 0.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system and the public safety employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing any portion of an unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall be in effect when the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system is less than 100 percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(5)(a) Beginning September 1, 2023, and ending August 31, 2027, the following employer contribution rates shall be in effect for the school employees' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

Fiscal Year ending:

2024

2025

2026

2027

2.50%

2.00%

1.50%

0.50%

(b) Beginning September 1, 2027, a minimum 0.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing any portion of an unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall be in effect when the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the public employees' retirement system is less than 100 percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(6)(a) Beginning September 1, 2023, and ending August 31, 2027, the following employer contribution rates shall be in effect for the teachers' retirement system that is used for the sole purpose of amortizing that portion of the unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009.

Fiscal Year ending:

2024

2025

2026

2027

0.50%

0.50%

0.00%

0.00%

(b) Beginning September 1, 2027, a minimum 0.50 percent contribution is established as part of the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement system, to be used for the sole purpose of amortizing any portion of an unfunded actuarial accrued liability in the teachers' retirement system plan 1 that excludes any amounts required to amortize plan 1 benefit improvements effective after June 30, 2009. This minimum contribution rate shall be in effect when the actuarial value of assets in plan 1 of the teachers' retirement system is less than 100 percent of the actuarial accrued liability.

(7) Upon completion of each biennial actuarial valuation, the state actuary shall review the appropriateness of the minimum contribution rates and recommend to the council any adjustments as may be needed due to material changes in benefits or actuarial assumptions, methods, or experience. Any changes adopted by the council shall be subject to revision by the legislature.

[ 2023 c 396 s 1; 2011 c 362 s 8; 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 7; 2009 c 561 s 5; 2006 c 365 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 396: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2023." [ 2023 c 396 s 3.]

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2011 c 362: See notes following RCW 41.32.483.

Effective date—2009 c 561: See note following RCW 41.45.010.

Effective date—2006 c 365: See note following RCW 41.45.020.